Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, §§ 81, 84.

§ 16.1-226.
Short title.

The short title of the statutes embraced in this chapter is “Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Law.”

History.

Code 1950, §

16.1-139

; 1956, c. 555; 1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1977, c. 559.

Cross references.

As to constitutional authority to establish and regulate jurisdiction of inferior courts, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 14.

As to the definitions used in the chapter regarding the Department of Criminal Justice Services, see §

9.1-101

.

As to duty of the Commissioner of Social Services to encourage and direct training of personnel of local boards and departments engaged in administering programs within the purview of §

16.1-226

et seq., see §

63.2-204

.

As to initiation by the Commissioner of Social Services of collection procedures upon an administrative support order, pursuant to §

16.1-226

et seq., see §

63.2-1916

.

As to the Uniform Collaborative Law Act, see Chapter 11 (§

20-168

et seq.) of Title 20.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Many of the cases cited in the notes under the various sections of this chapter were decided under corresponding provisions of former Chapter 8 of this title.

Law Review.

For note entitled, “The Dilemma of the ‘Uniquely Juvenile’ Offender,” see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 386 (1972).

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1976-1977, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1418 (1977).

For article, “The Revision of Virginia’s Juvenile Court Law,” see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 847 (1979).

For article, “The Rights of Adolescents,” see 23 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 363 (1982).

For a book review, “Random Violence and the Transformation of the Juvenile Justice Debate,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1095 (2000).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

§ 16.1-227.
Purpose and intent.

This law shall be construed liberally and as remedial in character, and the powers hereby conferred are intended to be general to effect the beneficial purposes herein set forth. It is the intention of this law that in all proceedings the welfare of the child and the family, the safety of the community and the protection of the rights of victims are the paramount concerns of the Commonwealth and to the end that these purposes may be attained, the judge shall possess all necessary and incidental powers and authority, whether legal or equitable in their nature.

This law shall be interpreted and construed so as to effectuate the following purposes:

To divert from or within the juvenile justice system, to the extent possible, consistent with the protection of the public safety, those children who can be cared for or treated through alternative programs;

To provide judicial procedures through which the provisions of this law are executed and enforced and in which the parties are assured a fair hearing and their constitutional and other rights are recognized and enforced;

To separate a child from such child’s parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis only when the child’s welfare is endangered or it is in the interest of public safety and then only after consideration of alternatives to out-of-home placement which afford effective protection to the child, his family, and the community; and

To protect the community against those acts of its citizens, both juveniles and adults, which are harmful to others and to reduce the incidence of delinquent behavior and to hold offenders accountable for their behavior.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-140; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1990, c. 554; 1991, c. 392; 1996, cc. 755, 914.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and in the introductory paragraph, substituted “and the family, the safety of the community and the protection of the rights of victims are” for “the family is” substituted “concerns” for “concern,” and substituted “these purposes” for “humane purposes,” and in subdivision 4, inserted “both juveniles and adults” following “acts of its citizens” and inserted “and to hold offenders accountable for their behavior” following “the incidence of delinquent behavior.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia domestic relations law for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1439 (1978).

For comment on termination of parental rights, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 213 (1980).

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 261 (1980).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 82.